Illinois, session 104th, HB2784.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Counties Code is amended by adding Section 55-8002.5 as follows: 6    (55 ILCS 5/5-8002.5 new)7    Sec. 5-8002.5. Contracts.8    (a) A county may make contracts with any city, village, or 9incorporated town or with any person, corporation, or county, 10or any agency created by intergovernmental agreement, for more 11than one year and not exceeding 30 years, relating to the 12collection and final disposition, or relating solely to either 13the collection or final disposition of garbage. A county may 14contract with private industry to operate a designated 15facility for the disposal, treatment, or recycling of garbage, 16and may enter into contracts with private firms or local 17governments for the delivery of garbage to such facility. In 18regard to a contract involving a garbage incineration 19facility, the 30-year contract limitation imposed by this 20Section shall be computed so that the 30 years shall not begin 21to run until the date on which the facility actually begins 22accepting garbage.23    (b) The payments required in regard to a contract entered   HB2784- 2 -LRB104 02986 RTM 13004 b1into under this Section shall not be regarded as indebtedness 2of the county for the purpose of any debt limitation imposed by 3any law. 4    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 5becoming law.